Wyoming statutes. Title 20 Domestic Relations
Article 1. In General
§ 20-2-111.
Alimony during pendency of action; allowances for prosecution or defense of action; costs.

In every action brought for divorce, the court may require either party to pay any sum necessary to enable the other to carry on or defend the action and for support and the support of the children of the parties during its pendency. The court may decree costs against either party and award execution for the costs, or it may direct costs to be paid out of any property sequestered, in the power of the court, or in the hands of a receiver. The court may also direct payment to either party for such purpose of any sum due and owing from any person.

History.

Laws 1882, ch. 40, § 12; R.S. 1887, § 1578; R.S. 1899, § 2995; C.S. 1910, § 2931; C.S. 1920, § 4997; R.S. 1931, § 35-115; C.S. 1945, § 3-5913; W.S. 1957, § 20-58; Laws 1977, ch. 152, § 1; Rev. W.S. 1957, §

20-2-111

.

Lack of record precluded review. —

District court did not abuse its discretion in failing to award the mother temporary alimony and attorney fees and costs to defend the divorce action, as the mother’s arguments relied on trial testimony, which the supreme court had not way of reviewing due to the mother’s failure to designate the trial transcript as part of the appellate record. Sears v. Sears, 2021 WY 20, 479 P.3d 767,

2021 Wyo. LEXIS 29

(Wyo. 2021).

Discretion not abused by award for attorney fees. —

District court acted well within its authority in ordering a father to pay a mother’s attorney fees and, therefore, there was no abuse of discretion; in enforcement actions, a court has discretion to award attorney fees and costs. Van Fleet v. Guyette, 2020 WY 78, 466 P.3d 812,

2020 Wyo. LEXIS 88

(Wyo. 2020).

Mother was not entitled to appellate attorneys’ fees based on a father’s lack of cogent argument and citation to pertinent legal authority because the trial court’s judgment was reversed in part, but the mother was statutorily entitled to reimbursement of certain costs and fees necessarily incurred in having to defend against the father’s largely baseless challenges to the trial court’s visitation and property division awards. Johnson v. Johnson, 2020 WY 18, 458 P.3d 27,

2020 Wyo. LEXIS 19

(Wyo. 2020).

Section inapplicable to action for breach of settlement agreement. —

Where an action by a divorced wife on a property settlement agreement was a proceeding for breach of contract and to recover damages therefor, it is not within the purview of this section, nor is it within the extended authority given this section by interpretations placed upon it which have held proper allowance of attorney's fees for prosecuting appeals in divorce actions or in proceedings for modification of divorce decrees or for enforcement of such decrees. Ulrich v. Ulrich, 366 P.2d 999,

1961 Wyo. LEXIS 136

(Wyo. 1961).

Parties and court bound by contract settlements. —

Contract between husband and wife fixing amount of alimony is binding upon both of them and upon court in trial of an action for divorce, contract in such and similar cases being presumed fair, and burden is on wife to establish the contrary. Rhinehart v. Rhinehart, 52 Wyo. 363, 75 P.2d 390,

1938 Wyo. LEXIS 36

(1938).

Discretion of court. —

Even though grave abuse of trial court's discretion is asserted, supreme court cannot fairly charge trial court therewith when it is not supplied with oral testimony given at hearings on motions before trial court. Book v. Book, 59 Wyo. 423, 141 P.2d 546,

1943 Wyo. LEXIS 22

(Wyo. 1943).

Extremely broad discretion in handling and disposing of matters allowing litigation expense and support money to wife in divorce action should not be interfered with by supreme court except upon clear proof that such discretion was gravely abused. Book v. Book, 59 Wyo. 423, 141 P.2d 546,

1943 Wyo. LEXIS 22

(Wyo. 1943); Haltom v. Haltom, 755 P.2d 876,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 80

(Wyo. 1988).

Interpretation of “necessary”. —

Although the husband asserted that the award of attorney's fees was not necessary under this section as the wife had the funds, the meaning of “necessary” in the statute was that the expenditure was required to defend the divorce case, which the husband had filed.
McMurry v. McMurry, 2010 WY 163, 245 P.3d 316,

2010 Wyo. LEXIS 172

(Wyo. 2010).

Attorney's fees awardable. —

Court has broad discretion as to whether to award attorney's fees pursuant to this section. Roberts v. Roberts, 816 P.2d 1293,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 141

(Wyo. 1991).

Husband's argument that attorney fee award was not authorized by this section was without merit because the appeal arose from wife's efforts to enforce the February 2006 judgment after husband's failure to comply.
Burnett v. Steeley, 2008 WY 94, 190 P.3d 132,

2008 Wyo. LEXIS 98

(Wyo. 2008).

Mother was
entitled to attorney's fees on appeal where had incurred thousands
of dollars in attorney's fees in post-divorce litigation and additional
fees were incurred in subsequent litigation and in the instant appeal,
her monthly net income for child support purposes was $3,378.15,
and
the post-divorce litigation generated in the case was excessive
and
much of the responsibility for that litigation rested with the
father. Jensen v. Milatzo-Jensen, 2014 WY 165, 340 P.3d 276,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 188

(Wyo. 2014).

Award of attorney fees. —

The district court did not abuse its discretion when it awarded attorney fees where the only evidence was an itemized list of plaintiff's attorney fees presented by plaintiff with no objection from defendant. Russell v. Russell, 948 P.2d 1351,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 142

(Wyo. 1997).

District court properly granted the wife attorney's fees and costs in a divorce case, where it was apparent from the record, including the accounting and itemized legal bills the wife submitted to the district court, as well as the wife's testimony, that the wife incurred the attorney's fees and costs at issue while attempting to enforce a district court's judgment against the husband; the statute authorized the district court to award the wife attorney's fees and costs for that purpose. Breitenstine v. Breitenstine, 2006 WY 48, 132 P.3d 189,

2006 Wyo. LEXIS 53

(Wyo. 2006).

Award of attorney
fees to the mother under this section was affirmed, even though the
contempt findings against the father were reversed, because the mother
was forced to file her motion to enforce the divorce decree. Bullock v. Bullock, 2014 WY 131, 336 P.3d 136,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 148

(Wyo. 2014).

Authority to fix and approve attorney's fees. —

While the statutes in divorce actions do not specifically provide authority to award attorney's fees, this section gives the trial court authority to require the husband to pay necessary sums for the wife to carry on or defend an action for divorce. The court has considered that authority to fix and approve attorney's fees. Prentice v. Prentice, 568 P.2d 883,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 280

(Wyo. 1977).

Attorney's fees not penalty. —

The allowance of attorney's fees is pursuant to the court's authority in divorce matters to assist the party in continuing the litigation of the action, and not as a penalty under Rule 10.05, W.R.A.P. Hendrickson v. Hendrickson, 583 P.2d 1265,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 223

(Wyo. 1978).

Evidentiary standard for fees, costs not satisfied. —

An informal exchange between the district court and wife's counsel regarding counsel's fees did not satisfy the evidentiary standard as to either attorney fees or costs. Delgado v. Delgado, 773 P.2d 446,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 123

(Wyo. 1989).

It was an abuse of discretion to order a father to pay a mother's
attorney's fees incurred in resisting the father's denied motions
for protective orders because the mother did not meet the mother's
burden to show the fees were reasonable.
Jensen v. Milatzo-Jensen, 2013 WY 27, 297 P.3d 768,

2013 Wyo. LEXIS 31

(Wyo. 2013).

Discretion not abused by award for attorney fees. —

Under this section, there was no abuse of discretion by the trial court when it required the husband to pay $7,000 towards the wife's attorney fees. Karns v. Karns, 511 P.2d 955,

1973 Wyo. LEXIS 168

(Wyo. 1973).

The trial court did not abuse its discretion in determining that the former wife's request for attorney's fees was reasonable based on an itemized list of fees she submitted. Rocha v. Rocha, 925 P.2d 231,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 139

(Wyo. 1996).

Although husband and wife were both independently wealthy, this section does not require that wife establish financial necessity for an award of attorney's fees and costs, and her itemized list of expenses was sufficient to establish reasonableness of fees in light of expenditures made by husband. Black v. De Black, 1 P.3d 1244,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 76

(Wyo. 2000).

In post-divorce proceedings, the mother was the prevailing party on the father's motion to modify child custody; notwithstanding the parties'
divorce settlement agreement, the district court's decision to award the mother $ 135,000 in attorneys'
fees and costs under this section was not unreasonable. The mother proved the reasonableness of the fees under the lodestar test, because her motion contained minute detail as to all that was involved in incurring the fees and costs; during the motion hearing, counsel also argued as to the reasonableness of the attorneys'
fees.
Weiss v. Weiss, 2009 WY 124, 217 P.3d 408,

2009 Wyo. LEXIS 136

(Wyo. 2009), reh'g denied,

2009 Wyo. LEXIS 160

(Wyo. Nov. 10, 2009).

Allowance of attorney's fees not needed. —

The wife did not need the allowance of attorney's fees to enable her to carry on an action to enforce the decree or to defend an action to modify the decree: she had a master's degree in special education and was employed as an educational diagnostician for a school district. Broyles v. Broyles, 711 P.2d 1119,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 614

(Wyo. 1985).

Modification of award. —

Application to modify award of alimony to wife, because of her remarriage, was properly denied, where alimony was in settlement of wife's claims against husband. Moore v. Moore, 33 Wyo. 230, 237 P. 235,

1925 Wyo. LEXIS 29

(Wyo. 1925).

Testimony on original trial was properly admitted on application to modify decree of alimony. Moore v. Moore, 33 Wyo. 230, 237 P. 235,

1925 Wyo. LEXIS 29

(Wyo. 1925).

Motion to reconsider. —

Where motion to reconsider was filed only six days after court's order denying wife's motion for temporary alimony, support and expense money and attorney's fees, motion was addressed to sound discretion of trial court. Book v. Book, 59 Wyo. 423, 141 P.2d 546,

1943 Wyo. LEXIS 22

(Wyo. 1943).

Dismissal of appeal as remedy. —

Where a husband brought error to review a judgment against him in divorce, and was required to pay his wife's attorney fees, which he failed to do, her remedy was by motion to dismiss, and not to punish him for contempt. Brown v. Brown, 22 Wyo. 316, 140 P. 829,

1914 Wyo. LEXIS 15

(Wyo. 1914).

Trial court may consider motion for support during appeal. —

After commencement of proceedings in error district court has jurisdiction to grant an order for a reasonable amount for support of the wife and a reasonable amount for attorney's fees. Snow v. Duxstad, 23 Wyo. 82, 147 P. 174,

1915 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo. 1915).

Or supreme court may consider motion. —

Where, on refusal to grant divorce, action was brought to supreme court on error, that court, in exercise of its appellate jurisdiction, may consider motion for an allowance for support of plaintiff and her child pending proceedings, and for reasonable allowance for expenses. Duxstad v. Duxstad, 16 Wyo. 396, 94 P. 463,

1908 Wyo. LEXIS 30

(Wyo. 1908).

Preservation for review of attorney fee award. —

Where wife appealed from the $15,000 awarded to her for her attorney fees pursuant to her Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

20-2-111

motion, the appellate court could not review the factual basis for the district court's discretionary ruling where there was no transcript of the hearing on the wife's motion for attorneys'
fees in the record.
Seherr-Thoss v. Seherr-Thoss, 2006 WY 111, 141 P.3d 705,

2006 Wyo. LEXIS 113

(Wyo. 2006).

Quoted

in

DeWitt v. Balben, 718 P.2d 854,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 539

(Wyo. 1986).

Cited

in

Cotton v. McCulloh, 2005 WY 159, 125 P.3d 252,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 190

(2005).

Law reviews. —

See “Alimony in an Ex Parte Proceeding,” 12 Wyo. L.J. 72 (1957).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Misconduct or fault of wife as affecting right to temporary alimony, 2 ALR2d 307.

Jurisdiction as to alimony or maintenance pending appeal of matrimonial action, 19 ALR2d 703.

Enforcement of claim for alimony or support, or for attorney's fees and costs incurred in connection therewith, against exemptions, 54 ALR2d 1422.

Amount of attorney's compensation for services in divorce matters, 56 ALR2d 13.

Husband's right to alimony, maintenance, suit money or attorney's fees, 66 ALR2d 880.

Necessity and sufficiency of notice and hearing as to allowance of suit money or counsel fees in divorce or other marital action, 10 ALR3d 280.

Wife's possession of independent means as affecting her right to temporary alimony, 60 A.L.R.3d 719.

Husband's death as affecting periodic payment provision of separation agreement, 5 ALR4th 1153.

Authority of divorce court to award prospective or anticipated attorneys' fees to enable parties to maintain or defend divorce suit, 22 ALR4th 407.

Excessiveness or adequacy of amount of money awarded as separate maintenance, alimony, or support for spouse without absolute divorce, 26 ALR4th 1190.

Excessiveness or adequacy of money awarded as temporary alimony, 26 ALR4th 1218.

Court's authority to award temporary alimony or suit money in action for divorce, separate maintenance, or alimony where the existence of a valid marriage is contested, 34 ALR4th 814.

Order awarding temporary support or living expenses upon separation of unmarried partners pending contract action based on services relating to personal relationship, 35 ALR4th 409.

Reconciliation as affecting decree for limited divorce, separation, alimony, separate maintenance or spousal support, 36 ALR4th 502.

Divorced or separated spouse's living with member of opposite sex as affecting other spouse's obligation of alimony or support under separation agreement, 47 ALR4th 38.

Power to modify spousal support award for a limited term, issued in conjunction with divorce, so as to extend the term or make the award permanent, 62 ALR4th 180.

Excessiveness or adequacy of attorneys' fees in domestic relations cases, 17 ALR5th 366.

Validity, construction, and application of provision in separation agreement affecting distribution or payment of attorneys' fees, 47 ALR5th 207.

Excessiveness or inadequacy of lump-sum alimony award, 49 ALR5th 441.

Alimony or child-support awards as subject to attorneys' liens, 49 ALR5th 595.

Effect of same-sex relationship on right to spousal support, 73 ALR5th 599.

§ 20-2-112.
Examination concerning property interests; enforcement of court orders; temporary custody of children.

In a proceeding for divorce, the court may cause the attendance of either party and compel an answer under oath concerning his property, rights or interests, or money that he may have or money due or to become due to him from others, and make such order thereon as is just and equitable. To enforce its orders concerning alimony, temporary or permanent, or property or pecuniary interests, the court may require security for obedience thereto, or may enforce the orders by attachment, commitment, injunction or by other means.

On the application of either party, the court may make such order concerning the care and custody of the minor children of the parties and their suitable maintenance during the pendency of the action as is proper and necessary and may enforce its order and decree in the manner provided in subsection (a) of this section. The party applying for the order shall notify the court of any known protection or custody orders issued on behalf of the parties from any other court. The court shall consider evidence of spouse abuse or child abuse as being contrary to the best interest of the children. If the court finds that family violence has occurred, the court shall make arrangements for visitation during temporary custody that best protect the children and the abused spouse from further harm.

History.

Laws 1882, ch. 40, §§ 13, 17; R.S. 1887, §§ 1579, 1583; R.S. 1899, §§ 2996, 3000; C.S. 1910, §§ 3932, 3936; C.S. 1920, §§ 4998, 5002; R.S. 1931, §§ 35-116, 35-120; C.S. 1945, §§ 3-5914, 3-5918; W.S. 1957, §§ 20-59, 20-60; Laws 1977, ch. 152, § 1; Rev. W.S. 1957, §

20-2-112

; Laws 1989, ch. 227, § 1; Laws 1999, ch. 93, § 1; 2000, ch. 34, § 3.

Cross references. —

For the Uniform Child Custody Jurisdiction Act, see chapter 5 of this title.

Welfare of child paramount consideration. —

In awarding custody of children in divorce proceedings, leading question is welfare and benefit of children, and parental wishes, rights, and affections must in all cases give way to this paramount issue, both in law and equity. Ex parte Madson, 25 Wyo. 338, 169 P. 336,

1917 Wyo. LEXIS 29

(Wyo. 1917).

In determining question of its custody, the welfare of a child of divorced parents is a matter of paramount consideration. Linch v. Harden, 26 Wyo. 47, 176 P. 156,

1918 Wyo. LEXIS 22

(Wyo. 1918).

Controlling question in awarding custody of children is their welfare, but rights of parents must be considered if not conflicting with such welfare. Stirrett v. Stirrett, 35 Wyo. 206, 248 P. 1,

1926 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo. 1926).

And custody may be given to third person. —

Under this section and former §

20-2-113

, relating to custody of children in divorce proceedings, court could order children into custody of third person during pendency of action. Ex parte Madson, 25 Wyo. 338, 169 P. 336,

1917 Wyo. LEXIS 29

(Wyo. 1917).

Jurisdiction to permit out-of-state visit. —

District court has jurisdiction to grant divorced wife permission to take children, who were in custody of husband, out of state for visit. Stirrett v. Stirrett, 35 Wyo. 206, 248 P. 1,

1926 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo. 1926).

Parent has duty to support incapacitated child

even though the child has reached the age of majority. Kamp v. Kamp, 640 P.2d 48,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 288

(Wyo. 1982).

Discretion of court. —

Order allowing wife to remove children, who were in custody of husband, from his home for visit on receiving court's permission was not abuse of discretion. Stirrett v. Stirrett, 35 Wyo. 206, 248 P. 1,

1926 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo. 1926).

Effect of child's earnings on parental liability for nonsupport. —

Husband who owed $1,670 for support of son attending university was liable for contempt though son earned $300 a month during the summer vacation, since earnings of child during the time a support order is in effect has no bearing on guilt or innocence of contempt. Weppner v. Weppner, 78 Wyo. 106, 319 P.2d 127,

1957 Wyo. LEXIS 36

(Wyo. 1957).

Failure to appear, pay support, justifies arrest. —

The trial court did not abuse its discretion in issuing a bench warrant for the husband's arrest and setting bail, where the husband had failed to attend at least three hearings and to pay temporary support, temporary alimony and attorney's fees. Honan v. Honan, 809 P.2d 783,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 52

(Wyo. 1991).

Court abused its discretion in issuing temporary order modifying custody. —

District court abused its discretion in issuing a temporary order modifying child custody because it was not appropriate to use a temporary order as a sort of probationary custody arrangement for over seven months before entering a final order; the temporary order sacrificed the children’s vital interest in stability; and, although the district court likely acted with the belief that the temporary order might enhance stability for the children, by keeping the shared custody arrangement in place and motivating the mother to stop drinking and cease her alienating conduct, the supreme court had rejected the courts’ attempts to make better parents out of the parties by imposing certain custody arrangements. Womack v. Swan, 2018 WY 27, 413 P.3d 127,

2018 Wyo. LEXIS 28

(Wyo. 2018).

Cited in

Tracy v. Tracy, 2017 WY 17, 388 P.3d 1257,

2017 Wyo. LEXIS 17

(Wyo. 2017).

Stated

in

Forney v. Minard, 849 P.2d 724,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 63

(Wyo. 1993).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Right to punish for contempt for failure to obey alimony decree either beyond power or jurisdiction of court or merely erroneous, 12 ALR2d 1059.

Decree for alimony rendered in another state or country (or domestic decree based thereon) as subject to proceedings, by equitable remedies or by contempt proceedings, 18 ALR2d 862.

Right to interest on unpaid alimony, 33 ALR2d 1455.

Pleading and burden of proof, in contempt proceedings, as to ability to comply with order for payment of alimony or child support, 53 ALR2d 591.

Proceeding for enforcement of order as affected by Soldiers' and Sailors' Civil Relief Act of 1940, as amended, 54 ALR2d 390.

Decree for periodical payments for support or alimony as a lien or the subject of a declaration of lien, 59 ALR2d 656.

Who may institute civil contempt proceeding arising out of matrimonial action, 61 ALR2d 1083.

Laches, statute of limitations or acquiescence as defense to action or proceeding for alimony or support of child allowed by court order or decree, 70 ALR2d 1250, 5 ALR4th 1015.

Necessity of notice of application for temporary custody of child, 31 ALR3d 1393.

Withholding visitation rights for failure to make alimony or support payments, 51 ALR3d 520.

Effect, in subsequent proceedings, of paternity findings or implications in divorce or annulment decree or in support or custody order made incidental thereto, 78 ALR3d 846.

Admissibility of social worker's expert testimony on child custody issues, 1 ALR4th 837.

Parent's physical disability or handicap as factor in custody award or proceedings, 3 ALR4th 1044.

Spouse's professional degree or license as marital property for purposes of alimony, support, or property settlement, 4 ALR4th 1294.

Laches or acquiescence as defense, so as to bar recovery of arrearages of permanent alimony or child support, 5 ALR4th 1015.

Appointment or discharge of receiver for marital or community property necessitated by suit for divorce or separation, 15 ALR4th 224.

Necessity of requiring presence in court of both parties in proceedings relating to custody or visitation of children, 15 ALR4th 864.

Propriety of awarding custody of child to parent residing or intending to reside in foreign country, 20 ALR4th 677.

Excessiveness or adequacy of amount of money awarded as separate maintenance, alimony, or support for spouse without absolute divorce, 26 ALR4th 1190.

Court-authorized permanent or temporary removal of child by parent to foreign country, 30 ALR4th 548.

Property settlement agreement as affecting divorced spouse's right to recover as named beneficiary under former spouse's life insurance policy, 31 ALR4th 59.

Spouse's right to discovery of closely held corporation records during divorce proceeding, 38 ALR4th 145.

Necessity that divorce court value property before distributing it, 51 ALR4th 11.

Divorce: propriety of using contempt proceeding to enforce property settlement award or order, 72 ALR4th 298.

Spouse's right to set off debt owed by other spouse against accrued spousal or child support payments, 11 ALR5th 259.

Rights and remedies of parents inter se with respect to the names of their children, 40 ALR5th 697.

Divorce and separation: attorney's contingent fee contracts as marital property subject to distribution, 44 ALR5th 671.

Construction and effect of statutes mandating consideration of, or creating presumptions regarding, domestic violence in awarding custody of children, 51 ALR5th 241.

Admissibility of expert testimony regarding questions of domestic law, 66 ALR5th 135.

Division of lottery proceeds in divorce proceedings, 124 ALR 5th 537.

§ 20-2-113.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2000, ch. 34, § 6.

Cross references. —

For present provisions as to custody and visitation, see §

20-2-201

et seq. For present provisions as to child support, see §

20-2-301

et seq.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1882, ch. 40, §§ 14, 29, related the the court's authority to make disposition of any children after granting a divorce or annulment decree.

§ 20-2-114.
Disposition of property to be equitable; factors; alimony generally.

Except as provided in subsection (b) of this section, in granting a divorce, the court shall make such disposition of the property of the parties as appears just and equitable, having regard for the respective merits of the parties and the condition in which they will be left by the divorce, the party through whom the property was acquired and the burdens imposed upon the property for the benefit of either party and children. The court may decree to either party reasonable alimony out of the estate of the other having regard for the other’s ability to pay and may order so much of the other’s real estate or the rents and profits thereof as is necessary be assigned and set out to either party for life, or may decree a specific sum be paid by either party.

In making a disposition of property pursuant to this section, a court shall not do any of the following:

Consider any federal disability benefits awarded to a veteran for service-connected disabilities pursuant to title 38, chapter 11 of the United States Code;

Indemnify a veteran’s spouse or former spouse for any waiver or reduction in military retirement or retainer pay related to receipt of veteran disability benefits pursuant to title 38, chapter 11 of the United States Code;

Award any other income or property of the veteran to the veteran’s spouse or former spouse as compensation for any waiver or reduction in military retirement or retainer pay related to receipt of veteran disability benefits pursuant to title 38, chapter 11 of the United States Code.

History.

Laws 1882, ch. 40, § 15; R.S. 1887, § 1581; R.S. 1899, § 2998; C.S. 1910, § 3934; C.S. 1920, § 5000; R.S. 1931, § 35-118; C.S. 1945, § 3-5916; W.S. 1957, § 20-63; Laws 1977, ch. 152, § 1; Rev. W.S. 1957, §

20-2-114

; Laws 1982, ch. 20, § 1; 2000, ch. 34, § 3; 2013 ch. 196, § 1, effective July 1, 2013.

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, designated the existing provision as (a), added “Except as provided in subsection (b) of this section” at the beginning of (a), and added (b).

I. General Consideration.

II. Disposition of Property.

III. Review and Enforcement.

§ 20-2-115.
[Amended and Renumbered.]

Amended and renumbered as §

20-2-314

by Laws 2000, ch. 34, § 2.